Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Joinder of Separate School District and Municipality in Establishing Industrial Enterprises

§ 57-1-71.
Declaration of intention; petition for certificate.

Any municipality located in two adjacent counties which forms a part of a municipal separate school district the territory of which is located in two adjacent counties which desires to enter into the establishment of an enterprise under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, jointly with the territory forming a part of such municipal separate school district shall, by and through its governing authority, declare its intention of entering into such plan by resolution spread upon its minutes and shall jointly with the boards of supervisors of the counties affected file with the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, a petition for certificate of public convenience and necessity in the manner and for the purpose prescribed by Section 57-1-21, and the governing authority of such municipality is authorized to proceed under Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, for and on behalf of the municipality and the municipal separate school district territory the same as if such territory were a part of said municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-31; Laws, 1950, ch. 520, §§ 1-7.

§ 57-1-73.
Issuance of certificate; election.

Should the certificate of public convenience and necessity be issued by the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board the governing authority of such municipality shall call an election in the municipality and in the territory outside the municipality in the manner and method for calling, conducting and holding elections provided in Section 57-1-25, and should two-thirds of the qualified electors residing in the municipality and voting in the election, and two-thirds of the qualified electors residing in the territory outside the municipality forming a part of the municipal separate school district of which such territory and municipality are a part and voting in the election, vote in favor of the enterprise, such municipal separate school district including the municipality shall be deemed a municipality within the meaning of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, and shall have all rights, powers and authority to act by and through the governing authority of such municipality granted to municipalities as defined in Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 and by said sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-31; Laws, 1950, ch. 520, §§ 1-7.

§ 57-1-75.
Issuance of bonds; contracts.

The governing authority of the municipality as defined in Sections 57-1-71 and 57-1-73, subject to the the approval of the boards of supervisors of each county having territory involved, may issue such bonds as may be authorized in the election held for the operation of the enterprise, and may make all contracts for the erection of buildings and structures and the acquisition and purchase of lands, and for the operation of such enterprise. It shall not be necessary for contracts entered into by the governing authority of the municipality to be approved by the boards of supervisors of the counties having territory included in such municipal separate school district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-31; Laws, 1950, ch. 520, §§ 1-7.

§ 57-1-77.
Execution of bonds; pledge of full faith and credit.

The bonds issued under Section 57-1-75 shall be issued and signed in the manner provided for the issuance of bonds by municipalities by Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, and shall pledge the full faith and credit of the entire municipal separate school district for which said bonds are issued, including the municipality and the territory outside such municipality lying in adjoining supervisors districts of adjacent counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-31; Laws, 1950, ch. 520, §§ 1-7.

§ 57-1-79.
Depository.

The governing authority of such municipality as defined in Sections 57-1-71 and 57-1-73 shall designate a depository for the funds of the municipality in the same manner as county depositories are designated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-31; Laws, 1950, ch. 520, §§ 1-7.

§ 57-1-81.
Tax levy.

On or before the first Monday of September of each year the governing authority of the municipality shall meet and levy a tax sufficient upon the taxable property of the territory, including the municipality, to provide funds for the payment of interest on bonds and the payment of bonds maturing within one year, and to provide a sinking fund for the redemption of any outstanding bonds and shall certify such levy to the boards of supervisors of each of the counties affected, prior to the date on which county tax levies are fixed, and it shall be the duty of the respective boards of supervisors to levy the tax prescribed by the governing authority of the municipality upon the taxable property of the territory, including the municipality located in their respective county. The tax collector of each county shall thereupon collect such tax in the same manner and at the same time as other taxes are collected and shall transmit the proceeds thereof to the governing authority of the municipality for deposit to the proper depository.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-31; Laws, 1950, ch. 520, §§ 1-7.

§ 57-1-83.
Rights and powers of municipality.

For the purpose of operating or engaging in the enterprise as authorized at the election held for that purpose the municipality herein authorized acting by and through its governing authority shall have all the rights, powers and authority granted to municipalities by Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, to act for the territory comprising the municipal separate school district of which such municipality is a part.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-31; Laws, 1950, ch. 520, §§ 1-7.